Hawaii statutes.
§173-3 Authorization of revenue bonds.
The department of land and natural resources may issue, as provided by part III
of chapter 39, revenue bonds in a total amount not exceeding $25,000,000 to
finance in whole or in part the costs of construction of new land areas under
this [chapter], and other costs as provided in section 173-1. [L 1957, JR 45,
§6; am L Sp 1959 2d, c 1, §21; am L 1961, c 132, §2; Supp, §99D-6; HRS §173-3]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next